https://anchor.fm/selfaware/episodes/Justification-vs-Masturbation-e2uhms



This episode has been a long time in the making I want to talk about.
Logic and reason.
The.
The problems I faced with logic and reason is like much everyone in the world.
We.
Go through life and start out very curious we asked why a little bit too much until we eventually start breaking the reasoning of adults where they say that's just the way things are.
This is what I Now understand is.
Where curiosity can break Collective reasoning societies throughout time have used Collective reasoning it to both support logic and to undermine Logic the problem is is throughout time in history the understanding of logic hasn't always been completely we do a pretty good job of projecting what we are able to know now on two people in the past and this is really really dangerous when we live in an information age and we can look up not just.
Inhope logical fallacies but we can look up all the logical fallacies that have been discovered through the world that may have been apparent in some civilizations in some corners of the globe but we're not obvious and others because of the way that their Collective reasoning took them to not have to face logical fallacies and then another part of the world may have face constantly and this is why morality seems relative when you start to travel Until you realize that we have been practicing Collective reasoning since the beginning of human civilization and when civilization start to overlap when they start to have a lot of immigrants whether they're taking in his slaves whether they're taken through conquering whether they you know immigrated peacefully this.
Starts to break Collective reasoning of cultures by introducing a new understanding of logic it was something I didn't understand about logic even about a year ago was logic is a lot like sound or numbers you don't need music or speech to have sound you don't need instruments or sheet music to have sound.
You don't need.
Math and geometry to have numbers you don't need to have pie in the golden ratio to have numbers but understanding why.
Something is reasonable is just as important as understanding why something is unreasonable why something can be understood NY something can be misunderstood.
Unfortunately through time this process which in our area is considered heuristics by psychology it's called heuristics and culturally through history we've had many different names for this fundamental reasoning fundamental reasoning is bringing logic and logical fallacies back into the game and realizing maybe we took Collective reasoning and made something a logical logical by Democratic consensus this is really really tough this is why scientists constantly get misunderstood when they are talking about if something is or isn't possible and it seems uncertain to an unscientific mind but actually.
It is probably the most shirt and a scientist could be it just sounds different and this is the key this is the difference this is why Gexa position versus juxtaposition exist is because reason can go beyond logic reason can break logic when it goes beyond logic means to be what the Constitution was supposed to be for the states is but realizing that one Collective reasoning.
Overpowers logic is when you start to have a federal state.
Instead of a Federal Constitution to limit over-ambitious states that want to infringe on human rights and then it there's no there's no way to question the state's reasoning the Central States reasoning if logic is considered to be the reason and logical fallacies are not only not taught but even if they're understood their understood partially and it's very important logically speaking not to just understand why something is true but why something isn't true why is some people to believe something isn't true this is why people could read the book of logical fallacies and be like oh yeah that makes sense and then conveniently forget it because they don't internalize that they don't want to practice it they don't even know that they don't want to practice it.
We're so conditioned to Forget by You know our genetic Nature by you know the way civilizations work you don't motivation and can tetanus are in a constant war with each other in the human mind so we have to constantly remind ourselves that you know we don't always remember to be logical and this is something that the more intelligent we get in a society the more ways we can explain away why something is reasonable but a child can say yeah but why and we think tank they're not wrong with that's just the way things are.
Now I don't know about you but I'm not naturally a scientist I'm I'm a creative and I don't do well with the Sciences I I can barely speak well in writing is even more difficult for me communication is very very hard I spent 30 years figuring out how to communicate in a way that most people figure out by the time they're a teenager but the problem that I face is is once I start to understand something and start to get better at it to the point where I have enough confidence in my ability to communicate.
Ideas that I didn't come up with that are just existing in the universe and in almost an eternal nature like numbers and sound and logic I find that the language that I used to be able to use intelligently fails me the same way that I could understand computer hardware but computer code is just as hard for me as learning language it's why I could spend six months in Mexico in my wife learn a new language like anyone else and I am so slow at learning at that I actually slow her down this is just how my brain works.
But it also happens that my brain can retain a lot more than other people's once I get to the point when I understand that most people go from you know a basic understanding and several weeks to you know a mediocre understanding within the first few months to in intermediate understanding within the first 6 months to you know in advance a mature understanding in about a year two within several years they have a practice Advanced understanding of things so it goes from understanding the theory to understanding application to afterwards they become considered an expert depending how many people believe them over other amateur experts with less experience this is just how the World War I.
The way my brain works is I collect knowledge and understanding with without bias realizing if I try to choose the right way to soon my hubris gets in the way my intelligence runs wild things that I'm absolutely right so practicing heuristics checking my logical fallacies with something that I was horrible at despite having memorized them for close to half a decade and then one day it clicked like things do always with me when I'm practicing something new I'd practice tech for several years before it clapped I practice marketing for a year-and-a-half before it clicked I practice growth hacking for about a year before it clicked I didn't know this is just how my brain works that was a deficit for so long and other people would encourage me.
And you know try and lift me up because this would get me depressed and now the point where I understand communication enough to express ideas even though I can't communicate them perfectly because honestly it is a logical fallacy to believe that you can ever explain something perfectly because it was so many different types of mines in the world you may be able to communicate something perfectly for one group but it will eventually break completely one presented with a different group and you might have several groups that understand it more than they don't understand it and other groups that don't understand it more than they understand it and other groups that just flat out don't understand it no matter if it was a perfect explanation for the people who think like you this is the problem we all face what I realize now is I'm a creative that learned how to think like a scientist not because I want to be a scientist.
But because I wasn't content believing that they know things that me as a creative are not able to know in that it is my own limitations to not focus on.
Their understanding that I could see was preferably more logic logical than anything that I find the world is about half creatives have engineering thinking it's a spectrum but a binary Spectrum like a binary star system where you know it seems like we set up shop either too close to one of the binary stars and we either get burned and if other people are setting up shop around the other star we run into the chance of collision we need to practice wisdom and realize even if we can explain why we should be closer to one of the Stars we should realize that we are only causing problems for a self believing that you know this.
Reasonable explanation is good enough this is this is illogical to the core and I for one have practiced illogical reasoning in ways that most people used to mock I have been apart of many scams and schemes and Colts in the world before this stuff started to click as I find many people who lean on the Creator side even if they're more functioning in a dualistic engineering-type middleman Society than I was and now that things are starting to click I realize that I attract logical thinkers in a way that I used to repulse logical thinkers with my absolute beliefs in conditioned Collective reasoning and collected reasoning is tough because it can work by democracy or.
Work by isolationism both are equally valid in protecting.
Collective reasoning this is why we can live in a world where you know no longer before the days of modern communication are collective reasoning really limited to small cultured groups of new ideas that context and time will tell us whether or not they are good or bad ideas based on their results this is where the word cult came from historically cultured beliefs Caesar what culture believes are exactly what religions were doing that's why the word culture feels so Taboo 2.
You know religious mind interesting Lee enough creative minds are more spiritual in nature than overtly logical Minds this is frustrating to create of the try to they can actually produce in a purely dualistic extreme dualism world like we live in today and are trained to reject the Paradox of creativity rather than find Harmony between you know creativity and Paradox and on the other end Duality and reasoning these things are a paradox it's not that reasoning is bad because there are some bad things about it it's realizing that it is both good and bad and logic is a paradoxical constant that can both form reasoning and break reasoning this is the world we live in this is what we've had to do with cycles of civilization.
About time this is why we get to the height of a human civilization and then logic breaks all the condition reasoning and then not only does that crumble That civilization but the next Advanced civilization goes the other way with dualism they go the other way they go either extreme Paradox in the beginning or extreme dualism this is what happened with the Roman society and then after the fall and the rise of monarchies again and then the rise and the fall and now the rise of you know Republican and then democracy and then the out-of-control Democracy that's more powerful than Republic as you know both Socrates and Benjamin Franklin predicted always happen with democracy until we can figure out a better way to have democracy which was the ideal.
Our way to have that been with a republic this is the time we lit it's so paradoxical and dualistic that the seemingly knee-jerk reaction when faced with an extreme do list Society is to go extreme Paradox this is why we have you know in all left forum and then in all right form to protect the status quo and label the alt left as alt left the problem is is neither one is right you can't go extreme dualism or extreme Paradox if you go extreme Paradox you don't listen to people trying to find Harmony between dualism and Paradox because paradoxes were things like logic and love and kindness and Trust live.
But dualism is also where things like reasoning cooperation collaboration Innovation live so we can't sacrifice one for the other it's realizing that to the people on the all right it will feel like even a harmonic balance.
Is alt left this is why the alt left feels a lot bigger than the alt-right is to people who are you know speaking the Harmony in the middle and left on the far end where they don't want any dualism but realizing that even capitalism is in dualism as much as socialism is in dualism paradoxes how you get both to twerk it away where the individual can be capitalistic but collectives can't abused a democracy in a way where you can have both innocent until proven guilty and guilty until proven innocent where one is really good for protecting the individual the other is really good for protecting the individual against things like conglomerates or tyrannical government this is what we need to realize that.
A future of Harmony and understanding and love and kindness isn't from going from extreme dualism to extreme Paradox but it's also realizing that the journey there will feel like extreme Paradox to anyone who is terrified of paradoxical truth like love trust kindness and logic these are the things that you cannot be afraid of one of these and not have a subtle fear that you are not aware of of the rest this is just the Paradox of what feels like absolutism but it's just logic it's it's not bad to be worse at one thing than other things nobody beats themselves up because they're not a Quantum scientist just as nobody beats themselves up because they're not you know.
Is there not able to understand how to run a criminal cartel.
This is this is really really interesting because it's finding Harmony like a yin and yang between Paradox and Duality it's not keeping them separate it's realizing for there to be Harmony Duality needs to tolerate a little bit of paradox in Paradox needs to tolerate a little bit of Duality and learn to find the benefit in equal halves this is why people on the far left can see someone like Jordan Peterson and want to reject them completely have a love-hate relationship with him where they don't know how to just have a love relationship with people that are different than them which is okay it's not wrong to not want to agree with people it's realizing that people like Jordan Peterson are on the left but they understand how to apply things like.
In love to an extreme dualism world that people younger than his generation without his training or without his training don't understand because he has a knowledge base that is more encompassing than most young people can begin to comprehend and why the very few young people that are trained in this field.
Defend him and are called all right even though in essence he is so far.
Harmonic left.
That.
People on the left without his knowledge base.
Consider him all right because he's Bridging the Gap he's Bridging the Divide between the alt right and the middle right the ones who are questioning the collective reasoning and following him and it's realizing that if the people on the alt-left can label every one on the right is all right depending on things they don't understand things that will work in the now to build to a more harmonious future wear for a while the rise of paradox will feel.
Crazy two people on the right but the people who are open to change open-minded to change will adapt if given time to transition this is why people like Jordan Peterson are essential in this transition this is why people on the right and the left on the Paradox and on The Duality side on the religious side and on the scientific side should definitely listen to people that make them uncomfortable like Jordan Peterson or Joe Rogan or Elon Musk or just be Jesus it's realizing that a scientist is more likely to thrive and Paradox than a creative that's thrives in Collective reasoning.
The problem is is the people that are more inclined to be that creative that loves.
Collective reasoning needs to realize that given enough time unless you're Immortal it will break unless you're an immortal benevolent you know.
Powerful leader it will break over time and we need to look at the scientist to give us hope for better tools than a republic to have a democracy tools that exist right beneath your nose right now this is the crazy thing it's realizing that because we're afraid of what's different which can heighten awareness we also need to heighten awareness of ourselves to realize that fear doesn't serve us once were aware of it like there is no way to have self-serving fear realize that even fear that is Justified that all I'm afraid of the bear given enough time and enough generations of people who don't understand the lessons that are logical that you may understand just because I'm afraid of it doesn't mean I need to kill all the Bears.
But given enough time your logic of okay is that bear is going to threaten you kill it to protect yourself but it's realizing there's also a wisdom of don't poke the bear.
If I'm not aware that I'm poking the bear but I'm not justified in killing it it's more justified in killing me unless I believe that I am a superior being no matter what is reality and this is where logic break reasoning it's realizing if you were poking a bear and it starts to eat you it's more Justified than any of your family could be to say okay now we need to make sure that all bears are dead.
This is this is the world we live in we have to find Harmony between Paradox and dualism we need to find Harmony between spirituality which is more commonly incubated in religion and spirituality that doesn't care about religion but cares about science this is the reasoning that will.
Lead to a logically reasonable Society where logic is understood in the way that he used to be carried on through stories and now it can be carried on in our memories in a way that we don't need stories to tell us good news good information good ideas the internet is the perfect incubator as it does not tolerate bad ideas even if they're wholeheartedly believed to be good ideas it will weed out all the bad ideas it is very very harsh on bad ideas at least it was before 2008 that's when it started to become a safe space and you know you have lots of safe spaces all over the internet now we're now you have Waring safe spaces within Waring face spaces within Waring safe spaces you have you know.
Reddit which used to be the ultimate unsafe space and now it's leaning more towards having incubated saturated safe spaces the same way of a on the other end of the spectrum Facebook is nothing but a toleration for safe spaces and it's realizing that you know regardless of something is illegal or legal Facebook will make safe spaces for bad ideas more often than it does for good ideas a lot of this shift started to happen after the Congressional hearing for Facebook this is an interesting fact this is when a lot of the the immense shutdowns of Facebook groups and Pages started happening in Rapid succession where they were a rare occurrence leaning more towards Collective reasoning that defied logic that engineer's can see and they saw it as anti religious or anti you know.
Belief it's it's realizing that the Nazis believed in what they did the same way all religions believe in what they do the difference is the outcome it's always the outcome it's not saying that since the Nazis believed in what they did that all religions are Nazis it's realizing that it's a radical ideology.
Like a cancer and Nazism was you know a cancer right out of the gate that said I'm not cancer and people believed it and they were sold on it and they figured out they were duped pretty quick but given enough time with Collective ideology that defines Collective reasoning given enough time and enough shifts of you know humans can control you don't even collect of reasoning no matter how benevolent will break down this is why.
Russia practicing socialism went a lot longer until they started breaking down the same way Nazi Germany did but interesting Lee enough.
It was the quote on quote Success and hidden atrocities happening the you know a cult atrocities the hidden knowledge the hidden truth of what was happening in the socialism and Russia that made even Americans believe that maybe socialism could work and then there was a debate between whether or not they wanted to go communistic socialism like Russia or fascist socialism like Nazi Germany and this was a debate you know when Hitler was on Time Magazine this was a real debate that blows most people's minds like this is this was the reality that they lived in there was a time when people were arguing the merits of Hitler's Fascism and Stalin's communism because there were Believers in America of social is.
The wanted to believe one of them was right and when Nazism like went South real quick now is the proof that communist socialism was the you know the good option and then shortly after World War 1 they found out okay no it just lasted a lot longer until I got to the same atrocities and this is the problem of running a paradoxical thing like you know social impact with a dualism model.
This will always happen when paradoxes run like dualism this is why socialism even somebody who is Rey's religious in multiple different religions studied in all of the religions modern religions in recently studying ancient religions understanding that these always break given enough time this is what absolutist do not want to accept this you know Eternal truth that belief systems break simply because people change in unless you don't think that people change over time you need to question whether or not you think people can ever change which kind of breaks some of the fundamentals that religions teach but people kind of forget based on if you look at the context of their choices in the way that they.
Actually believe despite what they're saying they believe this is why context is so important this is why so few people look at context this is why we need to find Harmony between Paradox and dualism cuz right now it's not that dualism is bad dualism just is the word extreme dualism right now and that is bad because it's providing bad results just as you know Paradox is not bad because love isn't bad trust isn't bad these things hurt bad.
It's also realizing that you know.
Just because science seems to love Paradox and scientist can be good moral people if they practice logic.
The same way that religious stories help people remember you know logical principles and understand not just why they should practice logical principles the logical fallacies which were so evident in religious Parables overtime and it's realizing that it's we live in a much bigger world than any one of the mainstream religions knew about when they were founded we live in an age of overwhelming information and now we have conflicting ideologies where none of them are absolutely right.
But not all of them are absolutely wrong in fact I don't know of any that are absolutely wrong they all have at least a seed of Truth left some of them have a lot more seeds but the fact is is all of them are dying and instead of trying to save this dying plant because we think that you know we can save it no it's coming to the end of its life cycle and it is either our choice to live in denial that we could say.
You know and save this being that served as for so long and in doing so turn it into a Frankenstein monster or we could understand that is laid seeds that we need to nurture seeds that exist in the internet not what the internet is now but what it was before 2008 if you don't know what change in 2008 look into.
You know how much information is generated every 3 days on the internet since 2008 and what the difference was before 2011 till 2008 this.
Will help you understand why you're feeling so confused if you even lean towards the slightest as a creative but you are not focusing your life on a creative Outlet you may have engineered a way to help yourself another creatives but if that's your main focus is engineered middleman for Creative you need to understand.
That the world doesn't tolerate.
Creativity Innovation love in an extreme dualism world this is why people can even engineer a middleman position as somebody who leans more towards the creative and still feel unfulfilled given enough time.
This is why we need to find Harmony between Paradox and dualism stop blaming other people for the divide that yes they created but we are creating new divides on the Paradox and by yelling at people for divide the.
Have been being have started to been built long before anyone on this Earth has been alive that is the truth that means we need to stop blaming other people for the divine's that they have perpetuated or else we will be unaware of the divine's that we are building on the paradoxical scientific side.
Did the people that are perpetuating these devices that have been going on for Generations before anyone alive was ever aware that they were building the Vibe back then we need to understand this pattern through history we need to realize that in our effort for social justice or social impact or more equality or more love or more kindness we need to realize that it will feel like we are tolerating the enemy.
On both sides.
And we need to find out a way to engineer a way above our feeling so that we can realize that when we leave our feelings behind we are left with our core emotions that leaves empathy that leaves love that leaves kindness and we are no longer struggling to figure out what place sympathy and plays in our lives what place Petty plays in our lives or what place nice displays in our lives none of these things are love or kindness or empathy.
They are the dishonest cousin of the good ideas that given enough time only provide bad results in context degrees of bad results so we ourselves by thinking okay this percentage of battery results is acceptable and unless it goes below this percentage that's when it breaks we live in a delusion where we are okay with imperfection because we believe in Perfection exists when imperfections are a collective belief.
This is something that in.
An extreme masculine world because I'm not saying that this is.
You know this isn't because of some male hierarchy this is because of an extreme masculine hierarchy there needs to be balance and Harmony between the masculine and feminine and realize that the justifications that go into the extreme masculine whether or not they are male or female.
That support hierarchies because they may be highly disagreeable in highly conscientious like I wasn't justify hierarchies like I did.
Because they are afraid of fighting order through chaos.
Because they need people to help them with that because if left to their own devices as an overtly individualistic Society does that doesn't find Value in harmony or collaboration that the only other option is.
Order out of chaos realizing that it is an artificial sense of order that is an artificial sense of safety that makes people weak.
And we can't blame them for wanting the safety in a world that is so chaotic that they didn't start nobody alive started we need to stop pointing fingers stop pointing blame and realize that we need to guide each other realize there are no such thing as teachers.
In the school of life no one is a teacher everyone is a student we are students leading students in realizing that this sounds a lot like the blind leading the blind.
But in reality it's like we live in a world where everyone is blind.
Until we start to listen to the crazy idea that some people aren't blind.
And we have to trust beyond our ability to believe.
To really realize that in a world where we thought where it's the blind leading the blind that the people who said they could see.
But we're bumping into things just as much as anyone else which is believable because if you're blind your whole love you you don't know any better in the people who say I never bump into things.
Or I rarely ever bump into things is more realistic I Really Ever bump into things that's so unbelievable they're like as a crazy blind man right there it's like don't listen to them like let's let's look for the people who are marginally better at this than us because really they just make us feel like we're making less mistakes if they're the ones that are making a mistake this is this is the paradoxical reality we live in it's realizing that if we if we spend so much time understanding why certain things are away like the blind leading the blind we also need to understand why things you know.
If it cannot be a certain way and we need to take that further its realizing even you know the parable that the industrialist which me is a capitalist you know a natural capitalist is what I call it when I type I hate industrialism I hate it I'm pretty pretty extreme on my end where I think that there should be nothing but personal brands that run capitalism that way it's not about contract deals where the wrong person can get something it's realizing everything is based on personal trust you separate personal property from private property and you have personal Brands this is why they've succeeded despite the ability to control them by Hollywood Disney and you know personal brands of Thrive with tools like YouTube and Instagram in a way that they're even starting to realize we're more than one thing.
You can get even a little bit of celebrity is a personal brand and they're even hat like.
Influencers are realizing that you don't have more than one thing I feel like I've been trapped into because I'm into this brand because I've been trying to do what Hollywood has taught all of us to do with our brand whether it's in print or TV or movies or anything like Hollywood is so much bigger than just the movies it is every single form of entertainment to the point where they control fiction non-fiction that they control the people who make the most in the legal system it's it's realizing its layers of indirect control its democracy abused to lay out the same way that the founding fathers intended you know a republic to work but without the checks and balances this is the reality we lived in in this is why creatives need to learn to question their beliefs all of them. Because unless you believe.
You're a horrible person waiting to let loose on the World to rape and murder and you know.
Rob people at gunpoint.
You don't need to be afraid of letting go of your memorize Collective reasoning realize that you figure out how to be you and you'll be surprised at how much better you can be righteous as a creative that has found Collective reasoning that you believe to be most right and let go of that because you're not going to go out in raped in pillage and murder and cheat on your wife unless you secretly want to do those things then you learn who you really are it's not about letting go as an excuse it's letting go so you have no excuses to justify.
Your belief and Imperfections it's realizing that for decades I was drawn down by this belief and Imperfections because they were divinely Justified.
And I got worse over time and I was beating myself up until I realized.
I'm not alone in this just other people are better at saving face and keeping these things private than me I'm in overly public person in the people who I was putting on a pedestal without them telling me to put them on a pedestal I just did it because it looked like they were getting it right more often than me I realized.
Everything that I believed about them I was lying to myself because you know Not only was I not asking the right questions but even if I did they would have believed that it's not my right to know that you know that their privacy is about saving face it's about.
It's about ego it's about Pride it's about narcissism there's been so many scholars that remind us that we are in the most narcissistic Society ever but it doesn't look like that way because we can always find somebody more narcissistic than us and this is what happens in extreme dualism you start measuring things by degrees instead of just realizing it doesn't matter if you know Trump is worse or Hillary is worse than me is a narcissist it's realizing if you have any narcissism it all it doesn't matter who's worse that's just an excuse to not work on your own narcissism because it's not as bad as them.
For years I didn't believe I was as narcissistic as people like privately believed about me but as soon as I started to be honest about my narcissism I got blamed a whole lot more for my narcissism than anyone ever wanted to when I was trying to be like them when I was trying to be nice like them now that I'm practicing kindness in love and listening to myself and others awareness of myself and others not blaming myself for my phone or others realizing that even communicating these things I constantly get accused.
Of being judgemental of others and where is it.
I'm aware that people are projecting upon me and I can't blame them because I used to do the same thing and it's not that I'm in a better place or that I'm more righteous or that I've got it more figured out now we're all in the same place at different times realizing I felt.
Holy beneath every single person around me last year when it's started and then at the end of last year I realized everyone else was blaming me for talking about my personal truth blaming me this is what I believe it's if somebody is talking about something it's what they believe it's always what they believe people that practice Collective reasoning can believe that it's absolute truth.
And then anyone who says differently that's what they believe it's like like everything is a belief as much as everything is a choice it's realizing the choice always resides within in the belief always resides when you know a personal truth is communicated a personal truth is truth inside based on choices that the individual maze once those choices are communicated that's a belief until somebody else experiments with something different than what they do and if it's not different than two people who it is different they think that it's what they believe but what's interesting is the people who practice logic who practice Helm Perfection and don't believe in imperfections.
Get called everything from.
You know.
Extremist religious or extremist scientist is they get called you know radical Christians radical sickness they get called crazy on every end of the spectrum but it's realizing that an extreme dualism the opposite of crazy is still crazy.
And if crazy is absolutely bad.
Then things that are paradoxical.
Will always be some degree of bad and we will always be chasing a phantom.
Trying to find a way to engineer our way out of trusting people engineering our way out of.
Letting love happen naturally engineering our way out of.
All of these things it's realizing that.
Even building tool scientific tools to have.
Trustless systems.
Does not mean that Youmans need to stop trusting each other.
It just feels that way when.
Everyone has so many trust issues.
But they don't see a way to trust.
Because the way they've been taught breaks down.
A certain percentage of the time every single time.
In a certain percentage of Badness every single time these are the things that just are on repeat and it's realizing that if you practice this is why the people who invented the tools for trustless systems.
I feel like it's a Fool's errand to try and explain how things won't go to shit if people have better tools to trust each other it's like the engineers are there to explain to people how they can fix their trust issues that they aren't even aware of that's the creatives roll this is why creatives were the ones that took scientific tools in Ain them at the human mind human consciousness for psychology in this was craziness and scientific medical profession now it's mainstream the same way but hundred years ago quantum theories were craziness and in the 90s it was borderline cult to most people that understood what was considered mainstream science and is still.
Pretty mainstream but what's interesting is quantum theories have become more mainstream than ever despite the Democratic consensus in majority that said that quantum theories were just as crazy and quality than ever and they're just using the internet to gain Traction in snow like it speaks to The Logical mind the same way that psychology turd psychobabble.
Intro to Psychology by inventing.
Cyclelogik this is what psychological study is realizing that the Bible isn't just absolutely bad it's not that they're absolutely possessed or that they are absolutely crazy but finding the psychologic to find a psychological method.
That we call psychology to find rationality in the on rational mind by applying logic to it.
This is the same thing we did with technology realizing that technobabble.
With technological plaid created a technological Revolution to now we have technologist in technology technologist invent the technology that people who don't understand Technologic and only hear technobabble can use technological tools that they can just call technology in the form of technological magic to anyone.
Who hears technobabble.
When a technologist is talking about a technological process this is the time we live in realizing that we need an era of technological psychologist in realizing that psychologists.
The age of.
Daniel Kahneman and Amos tversky and Carl Jung and even Freud it was an evolution.
That went from moving the best to better to now the better is good to even the point where what was once best is no longer even good.
And now we are in an era where we need to have the same sort of philosophers that explored the scientific method applied to human consciousness we need to apply this philosophy to decentralize tools known as technology.
That has been rising since the age of personal computers to mobile screens to now even decentralized open source tools that haven't really existed since the 1960s it's just there's so much more all-encompassing they look brand-new but open source and decentralization isn't new.
It's been going on since the 60s we just forgot about it because.
A technologist philosopher like Steve Jobs helped create is realize that technology isn't a tool for the Nerds it isn't a tool for the Geeks it isn't a tool for the engineer's it isn't a toy for the engineers it's a toy for them as well and creatives have paved a way to a Visionary future through creators like Steve Jobs that are unimaginable to the engineer's but they've been keeping up with an innovating on to make a rapid success cycle that has surpassed our ability to keep up with it we need an equivalent of philosophers for the human mind and the digital mind like we had for science with psychology.
Didn't realize that there was a good side and a bad side Troy got too involved with consumerism and that doesn't mean that all psychology is bad it's hasn't mean that anyone practicing cycle analytics is bad.
It's the Paradox that overtime the people who are using it for good even Freud in the beginning was against consumerism until his in his wealth was destroyed and taken by the Nazis and he missed his safety and comfort and security and signed on with his cousin who he was or not his got to his nephew is just talked about in the century of the self a documentary about Freud you know his teachings being used to invent consumerism by Edward Bernays the founder of Bernie's and marketing which is.
Everything that is marketing that is not growth hacking it is advertising PR is realizing that growth hacking is the ethical solution to bring Asian marketing Edward Bernays he invented PR he invented you know admin like he literally came up with the word public relations after the Nazi propaganda Minister who used his book propaganda which he was propagating to corporations before the war he had to Rebrand propaganda and invented PR so this is why we have a mass delusion that PR and propaganda are different but they're not the person who literally wrote both of the books on them was the same person who also in.
Wanted admin in our craving for ads it's realizing that we are getting out of this.
Naturally there's a transition out of it that you know Mega Geniuses like Seth Godin and.
Jeremy Rifkin are engineering our way out of this and helping other Engineers NJ engineer our way out of this this is why people like you know some of golden are so influential on people like Jeff Bezos and Elon Musk and Gary Vee and these revolutionary Geniuses that are applying these you know ethical methods to consumerism to kill consumerism to the energy sector to redefine the energy sector it's realizing that you know you can't just get rid of.
It out consumerism by killing capitalism you going to have an ethical natural form of capitalism which is really really missed when people look at Jeff Bezos because despite the conglomerate monopolies of retail he has succeeded beyond their wildest expectations through absolute control.
The same thing is happening with Elon Musk he he has engineered a way out of the energy sectors control in a way that we're realizing that everyone teaming up against him are really breaking their illusion that they're on different teams it's realizing that it seems like all of Wall Street is against him and for whatever reason he went on to Wall Street too early but that include quotations know he he went on to Wall Street when he did with Tesla literally.
To show people the hypocrisy by.
Making a parrot the contradictions that were otherwise subtle but if you look at how people are reacting to him the people that are reacting he's United people who are otherwise so busy arguing with each other in the news and in politics in government and anyhow in the SEC and in you know Wall Street he's United them because they all target him equally the same thing happens with Jeff Bezos this is why me as a capitalist at first when I started to realize that industrialism was a problem.
It took me awhile to realize holy crap.
Elon Musk and Jeff Bezos are anti industrialists they just can't wage an anti industrialist campaign literally because anti campaigns don't provide long-term result ever this is why Martin Luther King jr. didn't wage an anti-white campaign and it worked.
This is why you know Harvey Milk didn't wage in anti you know is cisgender campaign and it worked.
It's realizing that Nellie Bly didn't wagin and tie you know.
Mental health campaign and it works most people don't even know anything about like Nellie Bly let alone the details of what she did that was so radical for the ethical evolution of the mental health industry but realizing that people pay even less attention to Daniel Kahneman and Amos tversky and Carl you and really the psychologist that they think about the most when it comes to famous ones is Freud which gets people to think about psychology less because he's been publicly discredited despite the fact that his psychological tools and methods are used more than any other in the effort to keep control over over people through consumerism government it's realizing that it's.
It's a false flag they want you to hate and discredit and completely discount Sigmund Freud because even what they teach about in college is about Sigmund Freud for the most part was practiced in practices is just an innovation on Freudian control tactics.
Things have changed so much that Freud is still more of a household name then curl you more than Daniel Kahneman and Amos tversky yet the things that have gotten better with psychology.
Like medicine going from about a 50% chance you'd get better 40% chance you get worse 10% chance you stay the same to now a 50% chance you get better 40% chance you stay the same 10% chance you get worse this happened because of psychologist that most people aren't even aware of that are looking for Positive Solutions instead of control from hubris and pride and arrogance you know goodness can be controlled or enforce know a good idea doesn't need to be enforced this is why despite the resistance to people like Daniel Kahneman and Amos tversky which if you want to hear about their story like Michael Lewis you might have heard his works or even seen movies out of his works like The Blind Side Moneyball Big Short.
The Flash Boys one of my favorite books of his undoing the undoing project is the story of these people who you know when people are talking about the money ball of footballer the money ball of Wall Street or something like that's because of heuristics from Daniel Kahneman and Amos tversky it's realizing people want to in the scientific field they want to pick and choose your ristic.
Like religious people want to pick and choose principles.
It's realizing that you know the similarities between religious principles and scientific heuristics is shocking the way they are saying the same but feel different because of how they are defined.
Every single religious person needs to understand that your Mystics are an easier way of understanding.
How to think about the principles that you've been taught that you know you may not want to admit they are really hard to understand how to apply them in everyday life.
If you ever struggle with that study heuristics because this is all rooted from understanding the relationship between logic and logical fallacies understanding why something works and why it doesn't work so that you can't just do it and it works most of time and then you have no idea what to do when it doesn't work anything this is just chaos paradoxes people are bad is it makes it really hard to adapt that point but logicworks despite reason and we need to focus on this again as a society we need to figure out how we can let ourselves except the Inconvenient Truth that we are all students in life we know more than we ever had and then we ever have since the beginning of human civilization.
You know since the beginning of time as we know it we need to realize that we we need to reinvent a way we need to reinvent our foundation in this digital age a more effective way to process information the same way the rise in Psychology in the 1950s.
Was.
Just as important as the rise of psychology and after 1880 after Nellie Bly it was just as founded it goes through Cycles realizing the rise of psychology in the early eighteen-hundreds lean too close to consumerism and American anxiety was invented in My Age of Anxiety a really great book really really insightful book about how anxiety exist today how it's existed in the past bright yellow cover really really brilliant book and it goes into how we're going through the same anxiety cycle that they did in the 1800's anxiety was originally coined as American anxiety because we were we had it so much more in America than anywhere else in the world and now that America has made so many other places in the world like it is no longer American anxiety it's just anxiety but it requires the same results.
Same you know drastic measures that makes sense in hindsight like Nellie Bly did and realizing she had to drag you know what was considered the mental health industry out into the streets by going into their secrets going into the occult Hidden Truths and dragging it out for the street so people could see that in realize that now it's not as easy.
Because the mental and health that was being practiced in these mental asylums that were treating people who were both mentally ill and not mentally ill the people who just needed to be discarded by Society you know why is that spoke up too much that were part of the rising feminist movement of the pre first-wave feminism is all of this realizing that you know whether was immigrants or women or you know people that were thinking too far outside of the hierarchical Norms that weren't bill.
Absolutely extreme masculine because they weren't just men doing this it was men and women casting sisters casting daughters casting you know why they're casting you know.
Mistresses into these Asain asylums and Nellie bly's realization was that what they were doing.
Was making scene people insane.
And the insane were so terrified of getting the treatment that the same people were getting thick hymen say they didn't want they were scared straight and they were the most obedient people but they were actually the ones that needed help and they were getting it by using fear in the right way realizing that all man like.
Our reality is so fucked up I might as well just be scared afraid and silent and keep my head down like most mentally ill people today the problem is that this isn't this is not concentrated in insane asylums these days.
This is distributed far beyond insane asylums to be practiced in many colleges in many workplaces in many homes.
And that this is no longer as convenient as going into a hyper centralized place that practice is mental an Elven Nellie Bly can come out and say this is where they're practicing mental and health this means that literally it will feel like everyone is practicing mental and health because it's show distributed we practice it in degrees show where some people are practicing on mental and health others are not scientists that practice mental and health are practicing different types of mental and health then religious people that practice mental and health the fact is if we make a pieocracy the bad guy we forget that it is a catalyst for change in that contradiction is the only type of hypocrisy.
That is the bad guy all the other types of hypocrisy or what we need to accept because hypocrisy is the Catalyst to change contradiction is rejecting change and incubating apocracy.
Positive change comes from admitting.
You know that.
You're not perfect and that doesn't mean you need to beat yourself up over a belief and Imperfections it means letting it go in a way that is scary for a lot of people you know that are on the right or practice righteousness or practice religion or practice absolute correctness or you know absolute morality is realizing that sometimes you have to go off the beaten path or else you're going to spend your whole life complaining about the beaten path having too many you know puddles in it grow go off-road for when I grow up like I can't believe I'm saying this I'm not old enough to be saying this I'm not old enough to you know how the kind of wisdom that is.
Seems to most commonly come from people in aged unless you have a society that is.
So oppressive that it does the grinding force of life.
Much quicker than we have been used to this is the same thing that happened with a silent generation and a much younger age they were ground down by life to be wise at the age of 25 35 on average.
It's realizing that we are now in that era with younger Millennials and especially genze in because it looks different than when the silent generation grew up because they didn't have the capital to be able to inflate a bubble around a depression like we do today the young people without the experience and connections to make it in a bubble Society get ground down just like the silent generation did by depression and War we have an invisible depression.
And wore that we try to ignore.
That's the fact it's one of them is passively ignored because of the ignorance of higher-level Economics that are failing across-the-board all theories of Economics or wrong that's the Inconvenient Truth is much as the Inconvenient Truth is for socialist a socialist stick figure he's or wrong we're inventing new ways to bring Harmony between economics and socialism in a way that breaks all the old ideas all of them at least partially it breaks none of them absolutely because they all are based on a good idea that's able to be United and you know a digital future that.
And how.
There are people working on amazing things right now that are redefining economics and socialism in ways that.
Feels mostly wrong if you want Socialism or economics to be absolutely right this is the paradoxical harmonic reality that we are entering in and unless we get better and saying okay I can see how I was wrong how can I be more right and realized that is going to be met with extreme cognitive dissonance with the extremism of dualism that we have in society today then we need to have otherworldly patience when communicating with people on both sides of the spectrum extreme sides of the Spectrum by Jordan Peterson has such a men's patience with people on the far paradoxical side of the spectrum that he has the wisdom and experience to explain in a way that.
The way people are getting pissed off who are pissed off at dualism and industrialism in these things are the ones they're getting kicked getting really really offended on there contradictions the same way people on the right or getting really really offended about their contradictions when pointed out by people who understand the goal is to have Harmony between dualism and Paradox on the left.
It's realizing the people who are on the right and on the left but understand that there's a Harmony between dualism.
And Paradox are exactly why people like Jordan Peterson and Joe Rogan can have intellectual conversations the depending how far you go on the right or left you can find people that says best the most in unintellectual conversation because they either hate Joe Rogan too much and because he's too paradoxical to be on their side of the right and people who hate Jordan Peterson too much cuz he's too dualistic to be on their side of the left this is this is the craziness of the reality where you going to have essentially a civil conversation that define collective reasoning.
What is logical because their focus first and foremost on logical progression of thought adapting to the reality we live in realizing that when all the religions and all the governments were built up none of them had the information infrastructure that we have now and it's breaking all of them given enough time as it is why most of the world doesn't even see that we have a globalist nation state.
The governments are trying to Define Facebook's role in the world it's like the reality is is anyone who's terrified that the government is a tyrannical nation-state need to also accept that Facebook has the tools to become a tyrannical nation-state much more effectively than any type of human governance ever invented up until that point that's the scary reality we live in.
But I'm not afraid.
Because I have listened to the bullshyt long enough to understand why people believe in it and then it was my belief that it was bullshit and to realize I don't have to convert to any one's belief to listen to them long enough to understand why they believe what they believe realizing that anyone who dismisses what people believe because they believe what they believe is more rational is egotistical and narcissistic whether or not it happens on the scientific side or the religious side this is the Inconvenient Truth of trying to find Harmony between Paradox and dualism trying to find Harmony between systems in love.
Between systems and Trust.
Between systems and empathy.
Between systems and kindness.
And it's why chasing extreme dualism is as much of a pipe dream as a tracing extreme Paradox it's realizing that I was just as Wrong by the medical and.
Psychological Industries as anyone else maybe even more so because I trusted them more than most people would let themselves but I also don't blame they were practicing it's realizing that my choices are you know just as much at fault as their choices because it's not some secret esoteric Club work every single person in the medical you know industry is in on it when the reality is most of the people that were quote-unquote in on it we're aware of started it but it's extremely arrogant to believe that they could have seen the future that we're at now and that their ego didn't just get the best of them and people didn't want to question their ego because it worked and then overtime it broke down more and more we need to make sure we don't fall for the same trap by saying that the medical industry in the psychological industry is.
Completely and utterly bullshit absolutely it's realizing unless we understand why it doesn't work we can't just throw the baby out with the bathwater because we assume the baby's dead we need to actually do the terrifying work to check the really uncomfortable and unsettling work to check because if you throw the baby out with the bathwater and you don't check to see if it can be saved and you just take it out your life it's not breathing and because you don't know about CPR and you throw the baby out with the bathwater this is exactly why people.
Thought that you know zombies were thing because they would grave robbers would dig up Graves and find scratch marks on the coffin because people who went into a coma would be buried alive.
And that one day they wake up.
And realize they were buried alive realizing that at that time the best way to check if somebody was dead was to.
You know check and see if they were breathing and if they're in a coma the breathing could have been so faint that didn't come up maybe because they didn't hold the mirror close enough to their nose.
Maybe they were breathing show naturally through their nose in their mouth that they couldn't have held it close enough to get the fog unless it was pressed right up against it.
If they didn't do this then the only other way they had to check was to poke them with something that they are going to react to cuz they're in a coma.
And then they would bury them alive even though they scientifically tested that they were dead and now we realize.
It wasn't bullshit they just didn't have enough information to know any better so even the scientists were saying zombies are real thing because I knew that person was scientifically dead and they came back to life.
This means that the things we once thought were magic eventually when they're explained we realize that it wasn't magic we just weren't as smart as we thought we were in this type of hubris befalls the majority of religions any religion that was not founded before the information age Falls this year is any religion that practices the same sort of absolute truth that was made popular before the information age of Falls victim to this all of them that's that's the Inconvenient Truth that we found tools to innovate that.
Can literally prove that you know most beliefs are.
To some degree wrong and this is what is really the Inconvenient Truth it's realizing that if it was you know if you could be unaware of the percentage of wrongness of an absolute truth.
It's only a matter of time between before scientists start to invent tools that you know you have to either accept that you were wrong and you guessed and you're filling in the gaps of things you didn't know you don't know what you don't know you're filling in the gaps and not fall into the ego and narcissism to explain it all the way and realize that everything is a degree of belief until you don't have to believe anymore until you have the tools to know.
And this you know this is an anti-religious this is this same hubris befalls.
Scientist materials scientists have been doing the same thing to Quantum science and people like Tesla and Carl Jung and you know Daniel Kahneman and Amos tversky 450 years.
Material is science was originally the first two senators against the hubris of religion and now we've gotten to a point where we find you. Kind of a Harmony between science and religion but it's realizing that material is science is behaving in the same manner as.
Old fundamental religion that's been around more than you know 50 years and it's to the point where they have fallen into what I called culturism.
And we have a history of culture isn't that we don't want to admit because Colts never got to a point where they were more than you know a small group with defined belief and dogma and never got very large before you know the collective reasoning or logic broke it down or stopped at butt in it in the digital age was having his we redefined you know the cult like mine set to not need you know a defined you know.
Idaho strict Dogma it's it's realizing it's a combination of partial understanding and our own fears and anxieties and reactions to the world thinking fast when we should be thinking slow or thinking slow with explanations when we should be thinking fast and that leads to nothing but inaction and fear of making a choice or making excuses for not making a choice.
This is this is why Material Science has fallen into bed with all fundamental you know culturism that they used to fight in religion and now most of them are not even trying to find a way to get out of this narcissistic position does egocentric narcissistic position that they find themselves in that requires admitting we were wrong to the point where they're going to lose Authority they're going to lose the authority to control.
That goes far beyond religion and Science in this needs to be understood and communicated better than were able to communicate ever realize I'm not very good at communicating this stuff like I just spent an hour-and-a-half explaining things that.
Number one I'm not qualified to explain which is why I point to so many resources that I know in an instant gratification Society most people are going to come up with really intelligent excuses why they don't need to study these things why they know enough why they could look up the summary of the book and a pliant to what they know and fill in the rest with beliefs like this is this is the problem we face in a society that can barely even listen to an hour-and-a-half podcast episode let alone you don't read anything that takes longer than 20 minutes or an hour that could take days to finish a complex idea that isn't doesn't feel as good as a rationalize oversimplifies over over simplified bad idea that feels good if you can ignore.
Why it's wrong by cognitive dissonance justifying that would genetic fallacy all sorts of things like.
This is the craziness we live in realizing that I am a creative that understands things that most creative don't let themselves understand because they make really really you know great Justified excuses why they shouldn't know these things and why it should be simple why they should just get you know a reasonable like no idea how to do this without you know doing a conversation that's more uncomfortable than a 15-minute conversation that like feels really uncomfortable feels like a lecture because they want everything to be easy peasy lemon squeezy cuz they live in a nice reality or nothing is so hard that it takes weeks or months or years to work on until you can get it right this is why they're really good at a lot of things but they Master nothing this is why people can be really good at marriage.
And then it just all falls the fuck a part nobody teaches these things anymore the way that religion was supposed to teach these things so people don't know how to apply them to the Paradox that used to be religions territory the paradoxes of energies and spirituality in you no feelings and emotions in all of these things.
And now they are more on the side of fundamentalist materialist scientist that have found a way to enforce their bad ideas because we've outgrown them.
This is the society we live in where Quantum science has found a marriage of the principles.
Spiritual religions in the principles of Science in a way that breaks fundamentalist religious beliefs that have become so mainstream they they can democratize the democratize the fact that they aren't fundamentalist this is why you know they're not you know a culture there more than their culture it's like which more than their culture is their ability to control and if their ability to control was so benevolent why wouldn't they be conflicting with a culture that the people who are questioning the culture of these culture isms.
Are really scared to admit are much larger than the group or questioning the culture is a fundamental ideology that you know isn't really making progress that's breaking things down overtime that used to be private but now everyone can know when you've gotten a divorce or when things don't work out and it's realizing it hits closer to home when you can't live in constant denial of all the things that aren't working out.
And it's we start to realize you know the numbers don't serve us when even you know fundamental religions that are older than 50 years old don't.
Don't have an explanation that suffice is that you know they once believed that they had less than vorse than any other you know than any other religion than any other way to live and then the numbers finally came out and then they realize they have just as much numbers of divorce as any other religion is anyone else practicing any sort of belief or belief and unbelief and this breaks their Collective reasoning to the point where they dance around the fact that they were absolutely wrong.
And they try and save face so they don't lose control this happens in Material Science this happens in this happens in any religion older than 50 years old this happens in you know people who take spirituality so far that it is industrialized spirituality this is anyone who denies whether or not their spirituality is industrialize and engineered to control them without their awareness because of the things that they think are absolutely wrong being used against them like psychology and stuff like that it's it's realizing that.
At the top of corrupt socialism in at the top of corrupt in O capitalism is industrialism.
And at the top of corrupt medical practices at the top of corrupt.
At the top of corrupt psychological practices is industrialism this is the cancer that is infected the private sector the public sector and the nonprofit sector this is why the world has generated nongovernmental organizations because you realize that once you have you know your cancer infecting the for-profit the nonprofit in the public sector you know you can justify away corruption in all three parts in a way that seems esoteric but it's not because of secret not it's not a cold it's it's not hidden knowledge knowledge it's it's only esoteric that they don't want to try any better ideas and they don't want people to believe that their ideas are bad it's it's really esoteric a lack of knowledge.
That's why when people try and figure out what the industrialist know what they're hiding its.
It's like hunting is like a snipe hunt it's literally a snipe hunt they're looking for something that isn't there but the belief that there is something there is exactly what the people who are called the esoteric occult want even the conspiracy theorist to chase that they have some secret hidden knowledge when the fact is they have no different secret hidden knowledge than the people on the dualistic extreme otherwise do you know the criminal cartels and you know secret criminal underground organization it's like.
It secret because people don't know how or what they're doing that's the only secret they're hiding is they're both doing the exact same thing it's but chasing the answers at the you know the esoteric top is going to be just as lucrative as chasing the answers at the esoteric criminal bottom like this is the delusion we need to wake up from this is a delusion that I didn't know existed that I explained away brilliantly for years.
I'm working to open source that information so people can see how I didn't just magically come up with something that was right it was years of you no experimentation of figuring out what works best finding out a way that works better than any other way of trying I don't believe it's the absolute best way to work out but the sad reality is I've experimented with most ways to find absolute truth and I realize that I am now not alone in discovering that there is no such thing as absolute truth.
And that when you realize that your absolute truth.
Is just as likely to be true as anyone else's personal truth.
That's the only time that absolute wrongness exists it's it's realizing the goal of absolute truth an absolute wrong.
Is to neutralize each other cancel each other out so we can learn a lesson that we shouldn't Chase absolute truth because that's the only reason absolute wrongness exist and actually wrong as exist so people don't look at what is wrong this is why you have these principles of if you're in marketing.
Abrasion style marketing it's you know burnazian sell marketing PR advertising and propaganda it's the principle is if you want people.
If you want people to hear you tell them what is good if you want people to listen to you.
Tell them what is bad.
If you want people to ignore something.
Market and then ignore it and they will too because people listened actions much louder.
Then they listen to what is a good idea.
And they listen to bad ideas much louder than they listen to what is a good idea but they listen to people's action much louder than even the bad ideas.
And this is the world we live in where the esoteric.
You know actual knowledge that has been branded as a cult which I find really weird because of rid of that word actually means hidden knowledge the sentiment of whether or not it is good or bad has been collectivized to be an absolute truth that occult knowledge is bad but would surgeons now if you're not a surgeon is a cult what an accountant knows that you do not know is a Colt this is what that word means but in a world where people are afraid to say what they mean and don't understand how to hear or listen to what people mean is why they.
Will hear what is good but not listen to it and why they will listen to what is bad and tell people that they don't try and hear that stuff but they do listen to it but everyone ignores the things that are.
Dismissed with no mockery or ridicule for very short. Of time and then ignored they do this with so many things I've seen it done with people like Ron Paul where their mocked briefly and then ignored they do this with people like.
Martin Luther King jr..
Where they're marked and then they're ignored we feel like they listen to Martin Luther King jr. because we have hindsight because we listen to him now.
But they they mocked him and ignored him and realize he was still gaining Traction in a way that none of the other civil rights activist up until him had they had to just kill him like that's the reality that if things go further people like Ron Paul won't get to survive they will be killed.
Until things reset.
Reset is harshly as they did for the industrialist that were abusing you know Black Culture through industrialization the same way they abused them when they were slaves and they they did it in a more distributed manner through segregation.
And now they've figured out a way to do it even broader.
By pointing her Focus not on a race but on systems of belief.
This is this is what's interesting because you have systems of belief that have nothing to do with religion anymore this is why culturism is not about religion and it is about whether or not your religion is a culturalism system of belief whether or not your political party is a culture ISM system of belief whether or not you know your sports team is a Colt risom system of Ali whether or not a corporation that you like or work for is a culturalism system of belief.
It's it's realizing that you know.
We thank Apple for giving us personal computers and phones but IBM was the one who coined the phrase and the cult of apple and Steve Jobs he ended up liking it cuz he was culturing a good idea and no matter what other people tried to slander him with they it was only time that was needed to realize that they were wrong and they were saying these things that were so below so beneath their posture in the world but it became apparent that you know they were losing control they were saying things that they didn't need to if they had the control they were trying to make people believe they did in the same thing is happening with you know.
The mainstream accusing people like Jeff Beezus or Elon Musk of running cult-like organizations it's realizing that.
These things are Coltrane good ideas.
Using decentralized Technologies in ways that we haven't had 50 years prior to this with Computing and internet networks and you know there's so many internet's out there and most people only think of the internet like vgod when in reality Facebook is an internet Twitter is an internet your Facebook group or your Facebook page is an internet within an internet within an internet.
Misha said it's realizing it V internet is not V internet like there are many other internet and the internet that you know now wasn't even what internet was before it became the internet.
People don't realize that the difference between AOL and.
Help.
Http.
Is was literally the war for the internet who is going to be the internet this is the same War we have going on right now it's like is etherium V smart contract blockchain.
Now like Bitcoin is not V binary contract smart blockchain.
It is it is the blockchain right now but interesting enough there are better ones out there for use of currencies or other things it's like we have binaries blockchains we have smart blockchains and now we are getting to understand the need for Quantum blockchains we're understanding the need for Quantum civilization Quantum government Quantum psychology Quantum philosophy.
This is why.
Do you know this industrialist idea of.
Siloing everything has been challenged by growth hacking has been challenged by you know positive psychology has been challenged by you know.
Eastern spiritual Philosophy for hundreds of years and we're starting to realize okay we didn't want to believe that they were actually right but they're also not wrong.
And this is all encouragement to.
This is encouraged me to figure out what's not wrong like let go of what is absolutely right or Ashley wrong.
Because of what you believe then didn't exist tomorrow.
Would you choose differently when it comes to core principles.
You probably wouldn't be as afraid of being wrong because other people wouldn't have the means of the tools to judge you or oppress you or call you out on it if you know the main thority PowerPoint was gone.
What I suggested live like that today you will be surprised at how much more spiritual you could be how much more religious you could be how much more.
Let me rephrase it how much more righteous you could be how much more spiritual you could be how much more righteous you could be all of these things.
Require letting go in realizing that when you grab onto something new that's better it's only a matter of time before that goes from being your best option to just a better option one of many better options to you know a good option that's been innovated on and whether or not you live to see that happen which is getting more and more common in this rapidly accelerating and progressing you know natural capitalism natural impact like natural positive infrastructure we we call the internet but it's really just internet is moving things forward in a way that positivity is winning.
And it's only a matter of time before we hit that exponential curve and everything that was absolutely right and that we made desperately want to believe is absolutely right like Socialism or capitalism or capitalism that most capitalist like me were brainwashed into believing was capitalism but was really just an enabling industrialism and why good ideas like Quantum capitalism Quantum socialism Quantum psychology are taking off in a way where there providing long-term positive results they don't need to be fixed because they actually get better over time naturally in a way that overly centralized.
You know systems that abused democracies whether they be digital or traditional.
Don't they break down over time they don't get better they need to be fixed because they break down over time Quantum systems don't do this they get better over time they grow naturally stronger this is not like what people think about when they think of you know a guy that gets better over time it's like it's realizing this Parable has been explored in fiction and nonfiction alike but most people don't explore the non-fiction stuff because it's outside of their wheelhouse they only pay attention to entertainment stuff but realizing the sky nut that is centralized artificial intelligence in the same way the Nazis were centralizing very intelligent fascist structure.
They gave power to something that had to be stopped centralized artificial intelligence would be the same way.
But decentralized artificial intelligence is as a as threatening as a calculator realizing that if you were a human calculator which existed before the calculator was invented.
The calculator as you know it felt the same way that centralized artificial intelligence from Skynet feels to anyone who doesn't know how they could use that tool.
To be even more powerful human computers.
Kept us from having mathematicians.
Human computers.
Being made Obsolete and everyone can have a computer in their pocket.
Is giving everyone the capability of being a mathematician or mathematicians were here reticle philosophers up until the calculator became became mainstream.
This is this is just how evolution of ideas works.
We need to realize that all of the things that a I could replace.
If you are open-minded enough and strong enough to change and grow which will feel like growing up again guess what it doesn't matter how old you are you have to grow up again in this changing time.
This is where we've been duped by lots of industrial and systems of you know cutting principles and half cutting logic and her and taking one side of it and ignoring the other side like the story of Icarus Seth Godin told a story of Icarus that I remember seeing in a in a video where Icarus fly to flew too close to the Sun and his wings melted that's only half the parable.
His father taught him not to fly you note to low either because it's you know you'll get caught in the trees and I'll get torn down and when he almost got caught in the fog and was falling like in his effort to get all the fog you he sort of higher than ever and forgot that he was soaring too close to the Sun and fell to his death it's realizing self-mastery is.
You know finding that Harmony where self-control can help you from falling down to low.
But if you only know about you know it's bad fly up to high.
And you don't know about it being bad to fly to love than the human nature to be lazy and content and you know want the vacation or want the weekend or want retirement or want you know Paradise after death.
Will eventually.
Find a way to justify you know being in the fog and getting caught in the trees this is just the way life is it's in perfect.
It's realizing that this shatters all of our realities it shattered my reality.
And right now.
Depending on how good people are at listening.
Are you there look like a complete failure.
I look like a get it.
The fact is if they're both right.
Because both of their beliefs are valid because they choose to believe those things.
But time will tell which one is more likely to be right in the long-term I could justify both ways absolutely I could absolutely Justified both ways I could absolutely justify that I am a failure.
But I don't have the goal to be this way forever and I get out of school to justify that I am a great success and I see things getting even better because I'm only scratching the surface.
This is the Paradox that needs to be introduced to mental health to reawaken an interest in self-awareness and self-mastery so that people like Jordan Peterson or Gary V or Robert Green or Seth Godin can be better understood.
Because all of them are not wrong.
But all of them are not absolutely right for everyone this is this is the Paradox of reality you either choose to accept a truth that may be new and different or you don't.
Cuz you know what the world may not remember that there was a time when people were complaining that calculators were going to create mass unemployment.
But we also don't care.
So complaining about radical change.
You know isn't going to benefit you now or in the long run it just going to make you more Angry more upset.
And it will lead to all of your worries not only being forgotten but being pretty laughable in the future.
My goal isn't to.
Tear people down my call is to awaken people to a realization that is An Inconvenient Truth.
It was absolutely An Inconvenient Truth for me until it no longer wasn't and I realize that.
Hit nothing is absolute.
Unless you don't believe in time nothing is absolute things are only absolute in the right now.
But then the very next moment maybe even after you're very next choice and may not be absolute anymore.
Believing an absolute truth absolute brightness absolute wrongness absolute righteousness absolute evil.
Means you're in complete denial of how time works and it means that you are living a life whether or not you are aware of it or not your prisoner of time or time is being used as a tool against you and you think that time is a weapon that you are afraid of you don't have enough of you're always fighting against time because it you'll get time as a sword when in reality you can't see that it's an image of a sword on a shield and somebody is hiding behind it.
And your fear is being abused.
Time is a tool and when you start to pick it up and wheel that you realize it's not a sword but you could choose to capitalize on fear.
Or buy into other people's capitalization on fear.
And start using the shield as a sword because you still believe that it's a sword.
Because you don't let yourself know any better.
If you listen to anyone the pedals fear instead of Hope.
I'm not talking about accidentally I'm talking about people who in context continuously pedal fear because that is a currency that makes us feel validated with a scary reality that we live in with extreme dualism I'm talking about listen to the people who don't buy into fear and even when they do.
They learn their mistake the same way Elon Musk was peddling fear about Ai and I can guarantee he understood that if we had emotional intelligent processors for intelligent processors which we've invented because we don't give a crap about emotional intelligence in the Western World in a way that actually makes a difference.
Is realizing that if we could invent a computer that had both you know a data processor and an emotional processor.
It wouldn't turn into Skynet.
It would turn into you know the best teacher we've ever seen the best psychologists we've ever seen help us all in our own way figure out how to.
Become more emotionally intelligent become more emotionally aware realizing our emotional intelligence sucks as Western Society exists simply because our emotional knowledge is crap weeping feelings and emotions are the same thing don't feelings are reaction because we are afraid to be aware of our core emotions we need to bottle those up and we are driven by our feelings unaware that a feeling that feelings do not lead us to core emotions like love or Joy so chasing happiness.
Does not ever lead to Joy it's a Fool's errand that consumerism in many religions like to make people chase they like to consumerism burnazian marketing love plans of Happiness they built happiness machines.
That organizations use to help make people feel happy that wanted to chase happiness but over time they realized this doesn't provide me the joy that I thought it did this plan of happiness is bullshit.
And this is a very Inconvenient Truth depending what part of you no mainstream consumeristic belief you belong to whether it's religious or non-religious a like so many culture isms practice.
Plans of happiness.
That given enough time do not result in Joy they may accidentally.
But the exception is not the rule.
Exception is never the rule this is why people who are fundamental religionists.
They quickly argue that you know.
Rape is not the exception for why abortion should be you know.
You know it illegal or forced to Never Happened it's like they're trying to enforce a bad idea.
And the people were saying that we need to figure out a better way then you know so that we can solve these you know.
These breakdowns that are growing over time.
It's realizing that one side is arguing that people need to be more aware of their choices while they're making excuses to not be aware of their choices and enforcing you know a bad idea which is literally just you know not figuring out a way to improve things not trying to find a way to have Harmony because they believed in absolute truth they realize if they got exactly what they wanted and somebody in their religion rate you know their wife and they wanted a divorce and then as the divorce was happening they found out that you know they were pregnant and.
They didn't want the husband to have the same equal rights to the child as them so they protect the future of the child so they wanted the divorce but the cords you know favorite in one what was absolutely best for the child to have both parents is like these other than the new ones is that you know a binary system doesn't support any more problematic about fundamentalist binary definition of morality is they consider anything smarter than binary which is the difference between Alan turing's Alan turing's binary computer and every single phone everybody's pocket is much smarter is why you don't have to learn binary to use a computer anymore because we figured out smarter systems in binary absolutism.
Is no longer necessary it has been proven invalid regardless of what people want to believe or ready to believe or are ready to let themselves learn something new because it feels uncomfortable it feels evil the same way people on the extreme Paradox I'd think that any sort of reason any sort of you know everything has to be accepted started like that's taking it to the extreme on the other end it's realizing they're both equally as wrong and they're both as close to being right as you know.
You know a child who doesn't know how to talk doesn't know how to listen and.
Doesn't want to do anything other than what they want to do like that's That's How likely they are to be right over time unless they let go of these beliefs and they learn to First listen to uncomfortable things and also learn to not react when they talk because you need to listen past your comfort level.
To be able to not just react with an explanation of why you know you're not wrong why you don't feel wrong it doesn't matter what you feel your feelings don't matter like those those are to keep you from your core emotions your feelings are not serving you.
If you justify your feelings at all.
And you can't see a reality where you could live without feelings you're justifying your feelings because they Master you without you even being aware of it maybe not completely but enough to where you're not aware of how they Master you that's why I could feel uncomfortable to hear the idea that you don't need your feelings fuck your feelings but you can still have core emotions it's why I may feel uncomfortable to hear that you know your beliefs.
Are not useful.
In your effort to no more they are now detrimental in you need to let go of your beliefs because they're keeping you from knowing more they're keeping you from getting smarter it doesn't mean that I believe I'm smarter the fact is if I was one of the smartest people in the room because.
I chose to only talk about certain things.
If I chose to talk about things that other people seem to get because they were based on Collective reasoning I was the dumbest person in the room.
That's the truth like I I want to wear around my entire adult life.
Terrified.
But if I said the wrong thing people would understand how dumb I was cuz I'm so bad at you know what everyone else believes him.
I was feeling really bad at it.
If.
I wasn't quiet.
And then I realized that I could be really really good at it just by being quiet I realized that's what everyone else around me is doing they're just being quiet there you know it's it's not about being honest all the time it's about hiding the inconvenient honesty's its hello is it you got to you got to save face it's it's it's what's moral because it's for the greater good now that's Justified moral relativity is realizing it's justifications of bound.
And now that I have done you know the crazy thing to let go of justifying things to promote my my faults people people don't have the ability anymore on mass there is a select few have a natural ability to listen her like under you know children where they can listen with curiosity and not judgment and bias and you know.
Indignation based on ego and narcissism and the people who are able to listen like this surprise me who they are there people who are cast out by Society people were cast out by Society in the subclasses of the subclasses anyone who is you know labeled crazy weather it's you know the crazy woman or the crazy dude or the crazy Asian person or the crazy you know negative person or the crazy black person it's like realizing that crazy is something that kind of Unites all of us in a way where you don't actually have to be what most people would try to Define crazy as to be crazy anymore because most people wouldn't dare to find crazy as mentally ill so the people that get cast out by being called crazy.
Aren't even mentally ill by the most part and if they are they figured out how to practice mental health better than most people without mental illness.
This is the shocking Paradox we live in where words like crazy herds like mentally ill.
Or words like crazy words like mentally ill words like evil words like conspiracy don't mean what they used to I mean there is smarter definition now then the old binary definitions of things it's realizing of derp.
Multiple meanings to every word based on culture based on genetic fallacy based on you know the common definition of the word based on the root definition of the word based on how is being used popularly like these are we don't have one definition of anything anymore because.
What people mean is.
There's seven and a half billion ways to mean something and words get in the way of that more than they help with. That's why Alan Turing wanted universal language and even the father of binary like a hundred years before that one of the universal language and why people who you know.
Castrated and pushed Into Obscurity so far that Alan Turing in a.
Committed suicide it'll literally they castrated him because they out in him is gay and that was illegal in his area.
And eventually you would so discredited that they took the tool that he invented.
And didn't listen to him when he said that we needed universal language the fact is we need universal language again but we need to break all the old ideas of what universal language could look like break all the ideas of language and realize what people mean is more important than anything else sentiment is being abused by industrialism by using tools like MLP to understand people sentiment that they don't even understand about what they're saying online that's free and available to the public.
And you know industrialist consumers are abusing this tool and knowledge base to get these people to not only understand what they want but to engineer their wants to funnel every single last cent dime out of them like a hidden secret fee and tax buried in.
Consumerism buried under you know capitalism in this is this is sad this is why the ad Society is dying this is why you know how the pr Society is dying and this is why they're in denial when they talk to or when they hear people like Gary Vee or people like Seth Godin.
Something like Amazon and they get really pissed off because they're like off Amazon under mind my business I found a really lucrative product on it made millions and they took my business from me is no like they didn't tell you to use Freudian burnazian marketing tactics to engineer a wand it's but you did and you made Millions off of it hooray and they.
Did free market capitalism in undercut you because they could and they were aware and they wanted to make sure that you know you couldn't abused this anymore and if it's something that people really needed then it's available for as cheap as humanly possible through Amazon pretty much it cost and this deter.
Bernie's Ian marketing consumerism PR propaganda inspired by Freudian control tactics.
Better and more efficiently than any government regulation and you wonder why people like Trump are super anti.
Super anti Jeff Bezos it's realizing you know.
Even the situation she's going through right now with his divorce if they're focusing on him not her when in reality nothing is ever one-sided but he has a Public's attention.
And people would see it as wrong to go after her and people on Trump's side would absolutely see it is wrong to go after her when Trump and the old industrialists.
I hate Jeff Bezos.
Realizing it's one unconventional entrepreneur that they wanted not to succeed for decades has succeeded despite all expectations that they were trying to set for us to become the most successful man in the world by means of like sheer Capital that he holds when in reality like he takes less of a cut from everything on Amazon like Amazon takes less of a cut from everything on Amazon then retailers even gave suppliers which had the role of stocking their shells it's like this is amazing like it's their cutting out the middleman so that any supplier could be any you know inventor it's like they combine those two types of things where it's not about the middleman relationship between supplier and retailer and product maker its realizing product maker candy supplier and some.
Meijer Camby product makers on Amazon and they get the majority instead of the old retail model where the retailer gets the majority they get the biggest car and they get to you know they get to say what does and doesn't keep selling and Amazon isn't quite like that because the only things that they say you can or can't keep selling are manufactured once that are being milked for every cent they can be because of.
An unawareness of of any competition to compete with them because at Market domination and they undercut them and they do that because that's the same reason regulatory commissions would do that with abuse and Market Authority and Amazon doesn't want that to happen on their platform this is the you know the anti industrialists movement they can't be called an anti industrialist movement because anti anything doesn't work anti-smoking doesn't work who's the biggest perpetrator and perpetua and I don't know the word but who's the biggest proponent for.
Anti-Smoking the tobacco industry because anti campaigns don't work.
That's why.
We need to wake up to the fact that anti campaigns don't work and we've all been trained throughout our life to have some sort of anti campaign we believe in.
And it may be painted to not look like an anti campaign.
But it is.
It's realizing that if you were anti something even if you call it common sense gun laws.
It's realizing that this sounds like anti.
Literally if it requires registration of guns if he requires it out certain people not being able to buy guns this is an anti-gun campaign.
It's realizing that you know that's the easy fix.
The smart fix is how do we make guns less deadly.
This is why you know there are inventors out there that have invented things that are significantly better than Kevlar that her like.
Plastic Saran Wrap Tite plastic and it's not just bullet-resistant it's by today's standards it's bulletproof it would if this stuff was figured out how to get into clothing and Paint and Sip weed redefine the deadliness of guns in a way where we could have layers of protection that are just the same as close just the same as drapes on Windows just the same as the paint on our walls or it's it's realizing that you know for what is you know dollars now for this Saran Wrap like dollars compared to normal Saran Wrap what is dollars now will be pennies in the future which will be broken down into basic elements that can be put into paint or clothes he's are the things that exist it's like it's realizing that.
Wanting something that is.
A restriction or control of other people.
Is only evident of our unwillingness to do the hard thing.
Unwillingness to research what else is available and if nothing else is available.
Stop fucking complaining and go out and build it.
Stop griping about you know successful people because doing that you demonize all the innovators that are trying to have a positive impact on the world.
Anyone who complains about successful people sounds just as horribly entitled as somebody who complains about poor people.
Are those in poverty it's like.
Heating people in poverty is just the same as eating people that are successful it's realizing that you know.
It's a lack of empathy on both sides plain and simple and unwillingness to listen past things that make your skin crawl because you don't want to admit that you're weak and you won't do what it takes to work out your emotional intelligence to get stronger I did this most of my adult life this is why it is utterly shocking to people who have known me longest that I grew up in a way that they don't know how to believe that other people who are content with contentment and not progressing themselves any other way than maybe intellectually like they completely reject emotional intelligence.
Or they completely reject spiritual intelligence it depends what end of the spectrum there on I have a lot of people that don't believe in religion anymore who reject emotional intelligence in a lot of people who are into religion that reject spiritual intelligence but finding a Harmony between intellectualism and you know emotional and intellectual ISM and spiritual intellectualism means you have to go beyond spiritual knowledge you have to go beyond emotional knowledge you have to go beyond intellectual knowledge it's you have to find a Harmony between the emotion the data and the spirit.
Or else you know you're just going to be blaming other people for not being as wobbly as you and you're going to accuse them of being in a crazy for believing that their stable because they have a three-legged stool and you're trying to justify your one leg or two legged stool because you're like you know all the other people that are like you and your Collective reasoning.
This feels accusatory or judgemental but it's not I'm pretty much saying this to my past self realizing that my past self would fucking hate me for saying this would find a really intelligent way to mock me and ridicule me and dismiss me and make a joke about me so that they could ignore me and hopefully other people would too because.
That's the danger of One intellectualism turns into hyper intellectualism.
And some people dabble in emotional knowledge and spiritual knowledge.
And eventually towards the end of the life end of their life they may understand emotional intelligence or spiritual intelligence but I find very few people that are trying to practice spiritual intelligence emotional intelligence and helm.
What we consider the all-encompassing intelligence right now data based intelligence but that's the only way you get two wisdom and wisdom is in a goal it isn't a goal line wisdom either happens or doesn't happen before you die that's it it's not a goal you don't become wise you're just practicing wisdom is the difference between people who think more than they do.
This is why even Yoda would say you know there is no try you either do or do not you can think and know of a lot of ways to try something but if you're only open to trying.
You're never going to do the crazy thing and just keep doing it until you figure out either you know you no wrong or what what you thought you knew was right it just was a little bit Messier to get there than you expected this is this is the Inconvenient Truth.
Of an extreme dualism Society that's really great at justifying.
The reality of justifications is.
Justification is just like masturbation.
In the end you're only screwing yourself.
